sms/src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_AACCIKH
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_AACCIKH ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_ALGG
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_ALGG ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_SPÄʹSSEB
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_SPÄʹSSEB ;

LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_SÅÅBBAR
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%^Pen%^V2VV ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_SÅÅBBAR ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_MEERSAZH
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:až ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_MEERSAZH ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_SAQPPLI
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:i ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_SAQPPLI ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_VAQLL
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%^PAL ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_VAQLL ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_ÅÅʹLGA
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_ÅÅʹLGA ;

LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_MERJA
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_MERJA ;
LEXICON	 PROP_SEM/MAL_TERHI
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_TERHI ;
LEXICON	PROP_SEM/MAL_JOUSTE
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_JOUSTE ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_OULU
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_OULU ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_RADIO
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_RADIO ;


LEXICON PROP_SEM/SUR_
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: # ;

LEXICON PROP_SEM/SUR_PAPP
! This works for surnames in -off
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: NMN_PAPP ;

!
!LEXICON PROP_ČÅRRÕS
!+N+Prop: NMN_ČÅRRÕS ;

LEXICON NMN_TOLL-PLC
! This is copied from NMN_TOLL, but with the following modifications.
! plural: no
! possessive: no
! essive: no
! commitative: no
! diminutive derivations: no
! SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM -> SG-ABE/ACC/GEN

!! like KÕÕNJÂL 
! foot: 2syll
! diphthong: no
! vowel_shift: no
! consonant: geminate-single
! gradation: yes2
! weak_grade: single
! strong_grade: no
! Sg.Loc: âst
! Sg.Ill: palatalization-AND-e
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
!! !!1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst (no vowel shift, all raised)
!! !!  â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.1.1 Sg.Ill vowel	-e
!! !!1.1.1.1 Has Palatalization
!! !!1.1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!! !!  Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Not Palatalized: ELSE
!! !!    Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
!! !!1.1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.1.1.1[1].1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant and Consonant Geminate alternation)
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!! ** Yaml: __N-kidd, N-soll, N-toll, N-vorr__
!! strong_geminate, short_vowel, no_palatalization, high_stem_vowel 
 ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;	  !!= * @CODE@ toll
: SG-NOM ;	    	  !!= * @CODE@ toll
! :%>â ESS ;    		  = * @CODE@ tollân
:%>â PAR ;		  !!= * @CODE@ tollâd
!! strong_geminate, short_vowel, palatalization, high_stem_vowel
:%^PAL%>e SG-ILL ;   	  !!= * @CODE@ toʹlle
!! single_consonant, long_vowel, no_palatalization, high_stem_vowel
! :%^V2VV%^CC2C SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;	= * @CODE@ tool
:%^V2VV%^CC2C SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;	!!= * @CODE@ tool
:%^V2VV%^CC2C%>â SG-LOC ;               !!= * @CODE@ toolâst
! :%^V2VV%^CC2C SG-COM_IN ;               = * @CODE@ toolin
! :%^V2VV%^CC2C PL-OBL ;	                = * @CODE@ tooli, toolid, toolid, toolin, toolivuiʹm, toolitaa

! +Der/Dim+N:%^V2VV%^CC2C N_MUÕRÂŽ-WITHOUT-PAL ;  = * @CODE@ tool-
! !! single_consonant, long_vowel, palatalization, high_stem_vowel
! +Der/Dim+N:%^V2VV%^PAL%^CC2C N_MUÕRÂŽ-WITH-PAL ;  = * @CODE@ tooʹl-

! HatÂ-STEM-PX-RETAIN ;
! :%^V2VV%^CC2C HatÂ-STEM-PX-WEAKEN ;
! :%^V2VV%^CC2C HatÂ-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_NG ;
! :%^CC2C HatÂ-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;
!  HatÂ-STEM-PX-STENGTHEN ;




LEXICON NMN_KUSS-PLC
! This is copied from NMN_KUSS, but with the following modifications.
! plural: no
! possessive: no
! essive: no
! commitative: no
! diminutive derivations: no
! SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM -> SG-ABE/ACC/GEN

! foot: 2syll
! diphthong: no
! vowel_shift: no
! consonant: geminate
! gradation: yes2
! weak_grade: geminate
! strong_grade: no
! Sg.Loc: âst
! Sg.Ill: palatalization-AND-e
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
!! !!1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst (no vowel shift, all raised)
!! !!  â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.1.1 Sg.Ill vowel	-e
!! !!1.1.1.1 Has Palatalization
!! !!1.1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!! !!  Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Not Palatalized: ELSE
!! !!    Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
!! !!1.1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.1.1.1[1].1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant and Consonant Geminate alternation)
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!! ** Yaml: __N-kuss__
!! 
! ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;		= * @CODE@ kuss
: SG-NOM ;	    		!!= * @CODE@ kuss
! :%>â ESS ;     		 = * @CODE@ kussân
:%>â PAR ;			!!= * @CODE@ kussâd
:%^PAL%>e SG-ILL ;    		!!= * @CODE@ kuʹsse
:%^V2VV%^KK2GG SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;		!!= * @CODE@ kuuzz
:%^V2VV%^KK2GG%>â SG-LOC ;	!!= * @CODE@ kuuzzâ
! :%^V2VV%^KK2GG SG-COM_IN ;	= * @CODE@ kuuzzin
! :%^V2VV%^KK2GG PL-OBL ;	= * @CODE@ kuuzzi, kuuzzid, kuuzzid, kuuzzin, kuuzzivuiʹm, kuuzzitaa
+Der/Dim+N:%^V2VV%^KK2GG N_MUÕRÂŽ-WITHOUT-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ kuuzz-
+Der/Dim+N:%^V2VV%^PAL%^KK2GG N_MUÕRÂŽ-WITH-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ kuuʹzz-

! HatÂ-STEM-PX-RETAIN ;
! :%^V2VV%^KK2GG HatÂ-STEM-PX-WEAKEN ;
! :%^V2VV%^KK2GG HatÂ-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_NG ;
! :%^KK2G HatÂ-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;
!  HatÂ-STEM-PX-STENGTHEN ;
